Maryland, session 2025, SB0320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland

SENATE BILL 320 5
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2025 in the total principal amount of $1,814,825,000.
This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State general obligation
bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and issued, sold, and
delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence this loan or installments of this loan may be sold as a
single issue of bonds under § 8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT – GOVERNOR
D25E03.02 INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON SCHOOL
CONSTRUCTION
(A) Aging Schools Program. Provide additional grants for capital
improvements, repairs, and deferred maintenance work at
existing public school buildings. Grants shall be distributed to
local boards of education in proportion to grants received under
§ 5–324 of the Education Article (Statewide) ............................. 6,109,000
(B) Healthy School Facility Fund. Provide funds to public primary
and secondary schools in the State to improve the health of
school facilities. Grants shall be administered in accordance
with § 5–322 of the Education Article. Further provided that
funds shall be administered by the Interagency Commission on
School Construction (Statewide) ................................................. 90,000,000
(C) Public School Construction Program. Provide funds to
construct public school buildings and public school capital
improvements, including providing grants to local boards of
education for federal E–rate–eligible special construction such
as fiber and broadband infrastructure projects for
E–rate–eligible applicants in accordance with Title 5, Subtitle
3 of the Education Article (Statewide) ....................................... 290,857,000
(D) Senator James E. “Ed” DeGrange Nonpublic Aging Schools
Program. Provide funds to be distributed as grants to nonpublic
schools in Maryland for expenditures eligible under the Aging
Schools Program, including school security improvements.
Provided that grants may be provided only to nonpublic schools
eligible to receive Aid to Non–Public Schools R00A03.04 (for the

SENATE BILL 320
purchase of textbooks or computer hardware and software for
loans to students in eligible nonpublic schools) during the
2024–2025 school year or nonpublic schools that serve students
with disabilities through the Non–Public Placement Program
R00A02.07 Subprogram 0762, excluding preschools in fiscal
2026, with a maximum amount of $100,000 and a minimum
amount of $5,000 per eligible school.
Further provided that:
(a) Unless a school serves students through the
Non–Public Placement Program, an eligible school
may apply and qualify for a grant as specified below
based on the following criteria:
(1) At least 20% of the school’s
students are eligible for free
or reduced price meal
programs;
(2) Tuition charged to students
is less than the statewide
average per pupil
expenditure for public
schools as calculated by the
Maryland State Department
of Education; and
(3) The school has a facility with
an average age of 50 years or
more; and
(b) If a school meets:
(1) All three of the criteria
specified above, the school
may receive up to $100,000;
(2) Two of the three criteria
specified above, the school
may receive up to $75,000;
and
(3) One of the three criteria
specified above, the school
may receive up to $25,000.

SENATE BILL 320 7
Further provided that if more eligible schools apply and qualify
for grants than the total authorizations, the Maryland State
Department of Education shall prorate the grants based on the
total authorization amount. Further provided that the funds
shall be administered by the Maryland State Department of
Education and the Interagency Commission on School
Construction. Further provided that grants made to nonpublic
schools shall be expended within 3 years of the date that
funding for the grants became available. Any funding for grants
that is unexpended following 3 years of having become
available shall be transferred to the Unreserved Statewide
Contingency Account for public school construction
(Statewide) ................................................................................... 3,500,000
(E) Supplemental Capital Grant Program for Local School
Systems. Provide funds to local school systems with enrollment
growth that over the last 5 years exceeds 150% of the statewide
average or with 250 or more relocatable classrooms. These
funds shall be administered in accordance with § 5–313 of the
Education Article and can be used for grants to local boards of
education for federal E–rate–eligible special construction such
as fiber and broadband infrastructure projects for
E–rate–eligible applicants (Regional) ........................................ 53,891,000
DA02.01 DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES
(Statewide)
(A) Access Maryland. Provide funds to design and construct
architectural upgrades at State–owned facilities to improve
accessibility for persons with disabilities .................................... 1,027,000
DB01 HISTORIC ST. MARY’S CITY COMMISSION
(St. Mary’s County)
(A) Visitor Center Conversion for Education and Artisan Centers.
Provide funds to begin the design of renovations and expansion
of the visitor center at 18751 Hogaboom Lane and the adjacent
storage facility to create the Education Center and Artisan
Center Complex at Historic St. Mary’s City ............................... 381,000
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
GENERAL STATE FACILITIES
(Statewide)
(A) Facilities Renewal Fund. Provide funds for the repair and
rehabilitation of State–owned capital facilities .......................... 53,210,000

SENATE BILL 320
(B) Fuel Storage Tank System Replacement Program. Provide
funds for the demolition, repair, and rehabilitation of
State–owned fuel storage tanks and design, construction, and
equipping of replacements ........................................................... 1,500,000
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(C) New Supreme Court of Maryland Building. Provide funds to
continue construction of a new Supreme Court of Maryland
Building in Annapolis, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project
(Anne Arundel County) ............................................................... 51,117,000
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – ANNAPOLIS
(Anne Arundel County)
(D) Revolutionary War Memorial for Black Soldiers. Provide funds
to construct a new monument that honors Black Revolutionary
War Soldiers ................................................................................ 500,000
MILITARY DEPARTMENT
DH01.04 MILITARY DEPARTMENT OPERATIONS AND
MAINTENANCE
(A) Glen Burnie Readiness Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to continue design of renovations and an addition
to the Glen Burnie Readiness Center (Anne Arundel County) .. 176,000
(B) White Oak Readiness Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to continue design of renovations to and an
expansion of the White Oak Readiness Center (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 152,000
DP00.02 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES
(Anne Arundel County)
(A) Crownsville Veterans Cemetery Expansion and Improvements
– Phase IV. Provide funds to continue design of an expansion of
the burial capacity at Crownsville Veterans Cemetery .............. 113,000
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.10 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)

SENATE BILL 320 9
(A) African American Heritage Preservation Grant Program.
Provide funds to the Maryland Historical Trust to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §
5A–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article ............. 5,000,000
(B) Historic Preservation Grant Fund. Provide funds to the
Maryland Historical Trust for historic preservation and
museum assistance. The funds appropriated for this purpose
shall be administered in accordance with §§ 5A–328 and
5A–353 through 5A–359 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article ........................................................................................... 1,000,000
FB04 DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland FiRST. Provide funds to continue construction of a
statewide unified public safety radio communications
system ......................................................................................... 14,909,000
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
J00A01.05 WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT –
CAPITAL
(Regional)
(A) Washington Metropolitan Transit Authority Upgrades. Provide
funds to construct improvements and capital maintenance to
bus and rail systems in the Washington, D.C. area .................. 167,000,000
J00D00.02 MARYLAND PORT ADMINISTRATION
(Regional)
(A) Howard Street Tunnel. Provide funds to complete construction
of improvements to the Howard Street Tunnel and related rail
infrastructure primarily to increase vertical clearance ............. 31,500,000
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
KA05 CAPITAL GRANTS AND LOANS ADMINISTRATION
(Statewide)
(A) Community Parks and Playgrounds. Provide funds for grants
to local governments to design, construct, and equip
capital–eligible park and playground improvements ................ 5,000,000

SENATE BILL 320
KA17.01 FISHING AND BOATING SERVICES
(Statewide)
(A) Oyster Restoration Program. Provide funds to design and
construct oyster habitat restoration projects ............................. 4,032,000
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
MA01 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(A) Community Health Facilities Grant Program. Provide grants
to acquire, design, construct, renovate, and equip community
mental health, addiction treatment, and developmental
disabilities facilities. The funds appropriated for this purpose
shall be administered in accordance with §§ 24–601 through
24–607 of the Health – General Article and in accordance with
Code of Maryland Regulations (COMAR) 05.05.09
(Statewide) .................................................................................... 8,000,000
(B) Federally Qualified Health Centers Grant Program. Provide
grants to acquire, design, construct, renovate, and equip
buildings to be used as Federally Qualified Health Centers
(Statewide) ................................................................................... 3,500,000
(C) New Facility for Children and High Intensity Residential
Treatment Center. Provide funds to begin design of a new
Facility for Children and High Intensity Residential Treatment
Center on the campus of the Regional Institute for Children
and Adolescents – Baltimore (Baltimore City) .......................... 942,000
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Clifton T. Perkins Hospital Infrastructure Improvement.
Provide funds to complete replacement of the HVAC system
and other infrastructure improvements located at the Clifton
T. Perkins Hospital Center ......................................................... 12,500,000
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QR02.03 ROXBURY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION
(Washington County)
(A) RCI Perimeter Fence System Replacement. Provide funds to
complete design and begin construction of the replacement

SENATE BILL 320 11
perimeter fencing and security systems at Roxbury
Correctional Institution, provided that notwithstanding
Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on this project prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project .......................................................................................... 9,370,000
QS02.01 DIVISION OF CORRECTION
(Anne Arundel County)
(A) Jessup Region Electrical Infrastructure Upgrade. Provide
funds to complete construction of upgrades to the electrical
infrastructure servicing correctional facilities, support
buildings, and offices in the Jessup region ................................. 4,352,000
QS02.08 EASTERN CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION
(Somerset County)
(A) ECI High Temperature Distribution and Perimeter Security
Improvements. Provide funds to complete construction of the
replacement high temperature hot water system and perimeter
security fence system at the Eastern Correctional Institution in
Westover ...................................................................................... 5,868,000
QT04 DIVISION OF PRETRIAL DETENTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) Baltimore Therapeutic Treatment Center. Provide funds to
complete design and begin construction of a therapeutic
treatment and detention center at the Baltimore City
Correctional Complex, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may commence on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project ... 91,857,000
MARYLAND STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
RA11 MARYLAND STATE LIBRARY AGENCY
(Statewide)
(A) Public Library Capital Grant Program. Provide grants to
acquire land for, design, construct, and equip public library
facilities, provided that any reallocation of this authorization
or prior authorized funds for previously authorized or new
projects shall require notification to the General Assembly. The
funds appropriated for this purpose shall be administered in
accordance with § 23–509 of the Education Article ................... 7,500,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND

SENATE BILL 320
RB21 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE CAMPUS
(Baltimore City)
(A) New School of Social Work Building. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new School of Social Work building, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ............................................................... 42,924,000
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) Campuswide Building Systems and Infrastructure
Improvements. Provide funds to design, construct, and equip
campuswide infrastructure improvements at the College Park
campus ......................................................................................... 7,500,000
(B) Graduate Student Housing Site Development. Provide funds to
complete the construction and equipping of a graduate student
housing site development project ............................................... 5,000,000
(C) New Interdisciplinary Engineering Building – Zupnik Hall.
Provide funds to continue construction and equipping of the
interdisciplinary engineering building, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 58,700,000
RB23 BOWIE STATE UNIVERSITY
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Thurgood Marshall Library and Academic Commons.
Provide funds to continue design of a new Academic Commons
and Library building ................................................................... 2,230,000
RB24 TOWSON UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore County)
(A) Smith Hall Renovation and Reconstruction. Provide funds to
continue construction and begin equipping of the partial
demolition, renovation, and reconstruction of Smith Hall for
the College of Fine Arts and Communication, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 71,102,000

SENATE BILL 320 13
RB29 SALISBURY UNIVERSITY
(Wicomico County)
(A) Blackwell Hall Renovation. Provide funds to continue
construction of and equip the renovation of Blackwell Hall to
create a Student Services Center, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 35,011,000
RB31 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND BALTIMORE COUNTY
(Baltimore County)
(A) Sherman Hall Renovation. Provide funds to continue
construction and equipping of the renovation of Sherman Hall,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
continue on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project .............................................. 21,211,000
RB36 UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND OFFICE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Rita Colwell Center Deferred Maintenance. Provide funds to
complete design and continue construction of deferred
maintenance improvements, including central plant upgrades,
at the Rita Colwell Center in Baltimore City, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 7,100,000
RC00 BALTIMORE CITY COMMUNITY COLLEGE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Acquisition of Unidentified Properties. Provide funds to acquire
property adjacent to the Liberty Heights campus and to design
and construct site improvements ................................................ 9,000,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to complete design and
begin construction and equipping of a new high school boys’
residence and student center, high school girls’ residence,
flexible residence, satellite health center, and central offices at
the Maryland School for the Deaf in Frederick, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to

SENATE BILL 320
complete this project ................................................................... 12,193,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on each of these projects prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete the
project .......................................................................................... 60,229,000
(1) Allegany College of Maryland –
Workforce Development and
Training Center Renovation
(Allegany County)
(2) Anne Arundel Community College –
Dragun Building Renovation (Anne
Arundel County)
(3) Anne Arundel Community College –
Florestano Building Renovation
(Anne Arundel County)
(4) Chesapeake College – Queen Anne’s
Technical Building (Queen Anne’s
County)
(5) College of Southern Maryland – La
Plata – Student Resource Center
(Charles County)
(6) College of Southern Maryland –
Leonardtown – A Building
Renovation and Expansion (St.
Mary’s County)
(7) Community College of Baltimore
County – Catonsville – Student
Services Center Renovation and
Expansion (Baltimore County)
(8) Community College of Baltimore

SENATE BILL 320 15
County – Essex – Primary
Switchgear and Distribution
Replacement (Baltimore County)
(9) Hagerstown Community College –
Advanced Technology Center
Renovation (Washington County)
(10) Howard Community College – New
Workforce Development and
Trades Center (Howard County)
(11) Montgomery College – New
Germantown Student Services
Center (Montgomery County)
(12) Montgomery College – Rockville
Library Renovation (Montgomery
County)
(13) Prince George’s Community College
– Marlboro Hall Renovation and
Addition (Prince George’s County)
(14) Wor–Wic Community College –
Maintenance Building Expansion
(Wicomico County)
(B) Community College Facilities Renewal Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the community colleges with improvements,
repairs, and deferred maintenance projects. The funds shall be
administered in accordance with § 16–320 of the Education
Article (Statewide) ....................................................................... 3,011,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campus Expansion, Phase I – Lake Clifton High School
Demolition. Provide funds to complete the design and
demolition of the vacant Lake Clifton High School buildings,
remove and preserve public artwork, and stabilize the historic
valve house .................................................................................. 6,256,000
(B) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to continue design and begin construction of a new electrical
substation, substation upgrades, and related electrical
infrastructure components at Morgan State University,

SENATE BILL 320
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
commence on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project ............................................... 15,000,000
(C) Deferred Maintenance and Site Improvements. Provide funds
to design, construct, and equip various infrastructure, building
system, and site improvements .................................................. 13,400,000
(D) New Science Center, Phase II. Provide funds to complete design
and continue construction of the New Science Center, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ............................................................... 69,580,000
RQ00 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND MEDICAL SYSTEM
(A) Comprehensive Cancer Center. Provide a grant to the
University of Maryland Medical System to design, construct,
and equip facilities to expand clinical programs of the Marlene
and Stewart Greenebaum Comprehensive Cancer Center
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 32,000,000
(B) R Adams Cowley Shock Trauma Center – Phase III. Provide a
grant to the University of Maryland Medical System to assist in
the design, construction, and equipping of Phase III of
renovations, upgrades, and expansion to the R Adams Cowley
Shock Trauma Center (Baltimore City) ...................................... 250,000
(C) University of Maryland Shore Regional Health – New Easton
Regional Medical Center. Provide a grant to the University of
Maryland Medical System to assist in the design, construction,
and equipping of a new campus and facilities for the University
of Maryland Shore Regional Health – Regional Medical Center
in Easton (Talbot County) ............................................................ 20,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT
SA24 DIVISION OF NEIGHBORHOOD REVITALIZATION
(A) Baltimore Regional Neighborhood Initiative. Provide funds for
grants and loans to nonprofit community development
corporations or coalitions to fund comprehensive revitalization
strategies for Sustainable Communities in Baltimore City,
Baltimore County, and Anne Arundel County (Regional) .......... 27,000,000
(B) Business Facade Improvement Program. Provide funds for

SENATE BILL 320 17
grants to subdivisions and community development
organizations to assist businesses located in Sustainable
Communities with improving the outside appearance of their
facilities (Statewide) ..................................................................... 5,000,000
(C) Community Legacy Program. Provide funds to assist
neighborhoods with revitalization efforts. The funds shall be
administered in accordance with §§ 6–201 through 6–211 of the
Housing and Community Development Article and Code of
Maryland Regulations (COMAR) 05.17.01. Provided that any
financial assistance awarded under this program is not subject
to § 8–301 of the State Finance and Procurement Article
(Statewide) .................................................................................... 8,000,000
(D) National Capital Strategic Economic Development Fund.
Provide funds to assist government agencies and nonprofit
community development organizations to assist in
predevelopment activities for commercial and residential
development, including site acquisition, land assembly,
architecture and engineering, and site development for
revitalization in areas of the National Capital Region as set
forth by § 6–710 of the Housing and Community Development
Article (Regional) .......................................................................... 12,000,000
(E) Neighborhood Business Development Program. Provide funds
for grants and loans to fund community–based economic
development activities in revitalization areas designated by
local governments, including food desert projects in designated
food deserts. The funds shall be administered in accordance
with §§ 6–301 through 6–311 of the Housing and Community
Development Article (Statewide) ................................................. 10,000,000
(F) Seed Community Development Anchor Institution Fund.
Provide funds for grants to higher education and health care
institutions for community enhancement projects in
sustainable communities and blighted areas. The funds shall
be administered in accordance with § 4–509 of the Housing and
Community Development Article (Statewide) ............................ 10,000,000
(G) Strategic Demolition Fund. Provide funds for grants and loans
to government agencies and community development
organizations for demolition, land assembly, architecture and
engineering, and site development in designated Sustainable
Communities. The funds shall be administered in accordance
with § 4–508 of the Housing and Community Development
Article. Provided that any financial assistance awarded under
this program is not subject to § 8–301 of the State Finance and

SENATE BILL 320
Procurement Article (Statewide) ................................................. 60,000,000
SA25 DIVISION OF DEVELOPMENT FINANCE
(Statewide)
(A) Appraisal Gap Program – UPLIFT. Provide gap financing to
developers and homeowners for the difference between the
value of mortgages for distressed properties and their value
after renovation. This program operates in select areas of the
State where homes have been determined to be undervalued
and have historically lacked investment. These funds shall be
administered in accordance with §§ 4–2801 through 4–2806 of
the Housing and Community Development Article .................... 10,000,000
(B) Homeownership Programs. Provide funds for below–market
interest rate mortgages with minimum down payments to
low– and moderate–income homebuyers. These funds shall be
administered in accordance with §§ 4–235 through 4–241,
4–501, 4–502, 4–801 through 4–810, and 4–814 through 4–816
of the Housing and Community Development Article. Provided
that any financial assistance awarded under this program is
not subject to § 8–301 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article............................................................................................ 8,000,000
(C) Partnership Rental Housing Program. Provide funds to be
credited to the Partnership Rental Housing Fund to be
administered in accordance with §§ 4–501, 4–503, and 4–1201
through 4–1209 of the Housing and Community Development
Article............................................................................................ 8,000,000
(D) Rental Housing Programs. Provide funds for rental housing
developments that serve low– and moderate–income
households. The funds shall be administered in accordance
with §§ 4–401 through 4–411, 4–501, and 4–504 of the Housing
and Community Development Article ......................................... 85,000,000
(E) Shelter and Transitional Housing Facilities Grant Program.
Provide grants to acquire, design, construct, renovate, and
equip emergency shelters, transitional housing, and other
facilities for homeless individuals and families. The funds shall
be administered in accordance with Code of Maryland
Regulations (COMAR) 05.05.09 ................................................... 3,000,000
(F) Special Loan Programs. Provide funds to low– and
moderate–income families, sponsors of rental properties
occupied primarily by limited–income families, and nonprofit
sponsors of housing facilities, including group homes and

SENATE BILL 320 19
shelters to bring housing up to code and remediate lead paint
hazards. These funds shall be administered in accordance with
§§ 4–501, 4–505, 4–601 through 4–612, 4–701 through 4–712,
4–901 through 4–923, 4–928, 4–930, 4–931, and 4–933 of the
Housing and Community Development Article. Provided that
any financial assistance awarded under this program is not
subject to § 8–301 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article............................................................................................ 4,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
TG00 DIVISION OF MARKETING, TOURISM, AND THE ARTS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Arts Capital Grant Program. Provide funds to
eligible organizations for the acquisition, expansion,
renovation, or major repair of facilities or other infrastructure.
This program shall be administered in accordance with § 4–514
of the Economic Development Article ......................................... 3,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT
UA01 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(Statewide)
(A) Comprehensive Flood Management Grant Program. Provide
funds to local governments for projects that reduce the risk of
loss of life and property from flooding. Grant funds may be used
to acquire flood–prone properties for demolition or relocation,
install flood warning systems, and construct flood control
projects, including engineering studies required to support the
design of these projects. Capital projects that assist with flood
management techniques may include but are not limited to:
flood control dams, levees and dikes, stormwater detention or
retention structures, and flood proofing ..................................... 13,867,000
(B) Maryland Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund. Provide funds
to finance drinking water projects. The funds shall be
administered in accordance with § 9–1605.1 of the
Environment Article .................................................................... 11,488,000
(C) Maryland Water Quality Revolving Loan Fund. Provide funds
to finance water quality improvement projects. The funds shall
be administered in accordance with § 9–1605 of the
Environment Article .................................................................... 15,029,000
UB00 MARYLAND ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE

SENATE BILL 320
(Statewide)
(A) State Water and Sewer Infrastructure Improvement Fund.
Provide funds to design, construct, and equip water and
wastewater facility improvements for State institutions,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
commence on a project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete the project. Expenditures for a project
detailed in the Fiscal Year 2026 Capital Budget Volume under
this program may not exceed the amount listed therein by more
than 7.5% without notification to the General Assembly. Funds
may be spent only on the projects listed under this program in
the Fiscal Year 2026 Capital Budget Volume or on prior or
future authorized projects. Expenditure of any part of this
appropriation for a prior or future authorized project shall also
require notification to the General Assembly ............................ 2,598,000
VE01 DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
(Baltimore City)
(A) Maryland Youth Residence Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to continue design of the renovation and
expansion of a residential treatment center for male youths in
Baltimore City ............................................................................. 1,150,000
WA01 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
(A) Barrack A – Waterloo: New Barrack, Garage, and Historic
Barrack Renovation. Provide funds to begin design of a new
barrack, garage, and the renovation of a historic barrack in
Waterloo (Howard County) ......................................................... 523,000
(B) Barrack J – Annapolis: Communications Room and New
Garage. Provide funds to complete design and begin
construction and equipping of a new garage and the renovation
of Barrack J in Annapolis for a new communications room,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
commence on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project (Anne Arundel County) ....... 5,042,000
(C) Barrack L – Forestville: New Barrack and Garage. Provide
funds to complete design and continue construction of a
replacement barrack and garage in Forestville, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project (Prince George’s County) ......................... 7,376,000

SENATE BILL 320 21
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(A) Adventist Health – New Fort Washington Facility. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of Adventist HealthCare Fort
Washington Medical Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new facility for Adventist Health in Fort Washington (Prince
George’s County) ......................................................................... 2,500,000
(B) Annapolis City Dock. Provide a grant to the Mayor and City
Council of the City of Annapolis for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
resilience and revitalization projects at the Annapolis City
Dock (Anne Arundel County) ...................................................... 8,800,000
(C) B & O Railroad Museum. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the B & O Railroad Museum for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the B & O Railroad Museum
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 3,000,000
(D) Baltimore County – 911 Call Center. Provide a grant to the
County Executive and County Council of Baltimore County for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Baltimore County’s 911 Call Center
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 2,000,000
(E) Baltimore Museum of Art – Fire Suppression and Capital
Improvements. Provide a grant to the governing board of The
Baltimore Museum of Art, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Baltimore Museum of Art facility, including fire suppression
and related improvements (Baltimore City) .............................. 1,500,000
(F) Bowie Mill Bike Trail. Provide a grant to the County Executive
and County Council of Montgomery County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Bowie Mill bike trail (Montgomery County) .............................. 2,100,000
(G) Bowie Race Course Training Center Property and Rosecroft
Raceway. Provide a grant to the County Executive and County

SENATE BILL 320
Council of Prince George’s County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of land
and structures on and around the Bowie Race Course Training
Center Property and Rosecroft Raceway (Prince George’s
County) ........................................................................................ 6,200,000
(H) Catholic Charities – Intergenerational Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of the Associated Catholic Charities
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Catholic Charities Intergenerational
Center (Baltimore City) .............................................................. 2,000,000
(I) Center for Urban Families – North Monroe Street Capital
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Center of Urban Families for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the North Monroe
Street building (Baltimore City) ................................................. 1,000,000
(J) Downtown Partnership of Baltimore – Strategic Operations
Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Downtown Partnership of Baltimore, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new Strategic Operations Center in Baltimore City (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 5,000,000
(K) Glen Echo Park Spanish Ballroom Renovation. Provide a grant
to the County Executive and County Council of Montgomery
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the historic Glen Echo
Park Spanish Ballroom (Montgomery County) .......................... 1,500,000
(L) Greater Baden Medical Services – Ritchie Station Health
Center. Provide a grant to the Greater Baden Medical Services,
Inc. for the acquisition of property for a Federally Qualified
Health Center facility known as Ritchie Station Health Center
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 2,900,000
(M) Historic Annapolis Restoration. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Historic Annapolis, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Brice House, Paca House, and other State–owned historic

SENATE BILL 320 23
properties leased to Historic Annapolis, Inc. (Anne Arundel
County) ......................................................................................... 3,900,000
(N) Howard County – New Cultural Center. Provide a grant to the
Howard County Housing Commission for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new Cultural Center in Columbia (Howard County) .................. 2,000,000
(O) Inner Harbor Promenade. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Waterfront Management Authority for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of infrastructure improvements for the Inner Harbor
Promenade (Baltimore City) ....................................................... 38,000,000
(P) Johns Hopkins Bayview Medical Center – Burton Pavilion
Renovation. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of The
Johns Hopkins Health System for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
John R. Burton Pavilion at the Johns Hopkins Bayview Medical
Center (Baltimore City) .............................................................. 8,000,000
(Q) Kennedy Krieger Hospital – Innovative Care Center. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the Kennedy Krieger
Institute, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvements, and capital equipping of a new Innovative
Care Center (Baltimore City) ...................................................... 4,000,000
(R) Luminis Health Doctors Community Medical Center – New
Obstetrical Care Tower. Provide a grant to the Luminis Health
Doctors Community Medical Center, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the Luminis Health Doctors
Community Medical Center, including a new tower for
obstetrical care (Prince George’s County) ................................... 10,000,000
(S) Maryland Center for History and Culture – Enoch Pratt House
and Collections Storage Renovation. Provide a grant to the
Maryland Center for History and Culture for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Enoch Pratt House and Library Collections Storage (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 2,500,000

SENATE BILL 320
(T) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
Hood College. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
$2,480,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to
the Board of Trustees of Hood College for the design,
construction, and equipping of the renovation and expansion of
Hodson Annex, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Frederick County) .............................. 2,480,000
(U) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
McDaniel College. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
$2,160,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to
the Board of Trustees of McDaniel College for the design,
construction, and equipping of the renovation of the Merritt
Hall, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an
equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding the
provisions of Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may
consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this Act
(Carroll County)............................................................................ 2,160,000
(V) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
Stevenson University. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
$3,360,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to
the Board of Trustees of Stevenson University for the design
and construction of a new Music and Performing Arts Wing,
subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an equal
and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding the
provisions of Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may
consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this Act
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 3,360,000
(W) Maryland Zoo in Baltimore – Infrastructure and Habitat
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of the
Maryland Zoological Society, Inc. to assist in funding the
design, construction, and equipping of building, infrastructure,
and habitat improvements for the exhibits and operations of
the Maryland Zoo in Baltimore (Baltimore City) ........................ 4,750,000
(X) MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital
Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements to MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital (Prince

SENATE BILL 320 25
George’s County) .......................................................................... 10,000,000
(Y) Morton Street Dance Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide a grant to the Morton Street Dance Center for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Morton Street Dance Center, including an
addition (Baltimore City) ............................................................. 300,000
(Z) National Aquarium in Baltimore – Infrastructure
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
National Aquarium in Baltimore, Inc. to assist in the design,
construction, renovation, and equipping of infrastructure
improvements at the National Aquarium in Baltimore
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 1,000,000
(AA) New Edgewater Community Center. Provide a grant to the
County Executive and County Council of Anne Arundel County
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a new community center in Edgewater
(Anne Arundel County) ................................................................ 2,000,000
(AB) Pikesville Armory Foundation – Pikesville Armory Renovation.
Provide a grant to the governing board of the Pikesville Armory
Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Pikesville
Armory (Baltimore County) ........................................................ 5,000,000
(AC) Port Discovery Children’s Museum. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of The Baltimore Children’s Museum, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Port Discovery Children’s Museum
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 2,500,000
(AD) Rosecroft Raceway Economic Revitalization. Provide a grant to
Prince George’s Financial Services Corporation d.b.a. FSC
First for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the property
immediately surrounding Rosecroft Raceway (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 3,100,000
(AE) Salisbury Regional Airport – New Hangar. Provide a grant to
the County Council of Wicomico County, Maryland for the

SENATE BILL 320
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a new hangar at Salisbury–Ocean City: Wicomico
Regional Airport (Wicomico County) .......................................... 1,500,000
(AF) Southern Streams Health and Wellness Center. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the Mary Harvin
Transformation Center for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Southern Streams
Health and Wellness Center (Baltimore City) ............................ 2,100,000
(AG) Viva White Oak. Provide a grant to the Maryland Economic
Development Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Viva White Oak
project (Montgomery County) ...................................................... 6,000,000
(AH) Westport Capital Development – Kloman Street Relocation.
Provide a grant to the Westport Capital Development
Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the relocation and
realignment of Kloman Street in Baltimore City (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 1,000,000
(AI) White’s Ferry Project. Provide a grant to the County Executive
and County Council of Montgomery County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
White’s Ferry Project (Montgomery County) ............................. 1,500,000
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
(A) Atlantic General Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Atlantic General Hospital Corporation to assist in
the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the
Central Sterile Processing Department, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Worcester County) ............................. 79,000
(B) Brook Lane Health Services. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Brook Lane Health Services, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, and equipping of a new therapeutic
recreational facility on the campus of Brook Lane, subject to the

SENATE BILL 320 27
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Washington County) .......................... 2,979,000
(C) CalvertHealth Medical Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of CalvertHealth Medical Center, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the labor
and delivery area of the Family Birth Center, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Calvert County) ................................. 3,972,000
(D) Carroll Hospital Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Carroll Hospital Center, Inc. to assist in the design,
construction, expansion, renovation, and equipping of the
Emergency Department, subject to the requirement that the
grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Carroll County) .................................................................... 887,000
(E) Frederick Health Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Frederick Health Hospital, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of its operating
suite, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an
equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Frederick
County) ........................................................................................ 100,000
(F) Greater Baltimore Medical Center. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Greater Baltimore Medical Center, Inc.
for the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the
Radiation Oncology Center, subject to the requirement that the
grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Baltimore County) ............................................................... 1,280,000
(G) Howard County General Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board
of Trustees of Howard County General Hospital, Inc. for the
design, construction, expansion, renovation, and equipping of
the Observation Service Unit, subject to the requirement that
the grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this
purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the

SENATE BILL 320
matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Howard County) ................................ 733,000
(H) Kennedy Krieger Children’s Hospital. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Kennedy Krieger Children’s Hospital, Inc.
to assist in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping
of the Inpatient Specialty Rehabilitation Unit, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Baltimore City) .................................. 4,000,000
(I) MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of MedStar Southern Maryland
Hospital Center, Inc. to assist in the design, construction,
expansion, renovation, and equipping of the urology suite and
an operating room, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Prince George’s County) ...................................................... 100,000
(J) Mercy Medical Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Mercy Medical Center, Inc. to assist in the design,
construction, renovation, and equipping of its facilities to
collocate and expand primary care space on the Mercy Medical
Center campus, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Baltimore City) .................................................................... 1,931,000
(K) Montgomery General Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Montgomery General Hospital, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the
behavioral health inpatient facilities at MedStar Montgomery
Medical Center’s Addiction and Mental Health Center, subject
to the requirement that the grantee provide an equal and
matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5)
of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds expended
prior to the effective date of this Act (Montgomery County) ..... 100,000
(L) Northwest Hospital Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Northwest Hospital Center, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the
Emergency Department, subject to the requirement that the
grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.

SENATE BILL 320 29
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Baltimore County) ............................................................... 90,000
(M) St. Agnes Healthcare. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of St. Agnes Healthcare, Inc. to assist in the design,
construction, renovation, and equipping of the Family Birthing
Center, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an
equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 1,986,000
(N) Sheppard Pratt Health System. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Sheppard Pratt Health System, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the
Adolescent Neuropsychiatric Unit on the Towson campus,
subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an equal
and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section
1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Baltimore
County) ........................................................................................ 185,000
(O) Sheppard Pratt Health System. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Sheppard Pratt Health System, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the Adult
Neuropsychiatric Unit on the Towson campus, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Baltimore County) ............................. 79,000
(P) Sheppard Pratt Health System. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Sheppard Pratt Health System, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the Day
Hospitals on the Towson campus, subject to the requirement
that the grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this
purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Baltimore County) ............................. 97,000
(Q) Sinai Hospital of Baltimore. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Sinai Hospital of Baltimore, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the Women’s
and Children’s Department, subject to the requirement that
the grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this
purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the

SENATE BILL 320
matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Baltimore City) .................................. 393,000
(R) The Children’s Inn at the National Institutes of Health.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Children’s Inn at
NIH, Inc. to assist in the design, construction, and equipping of
renovations of a new community kitchen and dining lounge at
The Children’s Inn at NIH, subject to the requirement that the
grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Montgomery County) ........................................................... 208,000
(S) The Johns Hopkins Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of The Johns Hopkins Hospital to assist in the design,
construction, expansion, renovation, and equipping of the
Pediatric Emergency Department Psychiatric Unit, subject to
the requirement that the grantee provide an equal and
matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5)
of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds expended
prior to the effective date of this Act (Baltimore City) .............. 172,000
(T) TidalHealth Peninsula Regional. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of TidalHealth Peninsula Regional, Inc. to assist in
the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of a new
Family Medicine Residency Clinic, subject to the requirement
that the grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this
purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Wicomico County) .............................. 2,226,000
(U) University of Maryland Baltimore Washington Medical Center.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the University of
Maryland Baltimore Washington Medical Center, Inc. to assist
in the design, construction, and equipping of a dedicated
forensic nursing treatment zone in the University of Maryland
Baltimore Washington Medical Center’s Emergency
Department subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Anne Arundel County).......................................................... 106,000
(V) University of Maryland Upper Chesapeake Medical Center.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the University of
Maryland Upper Chesapeake Medical Center, Inc. to assist in
the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the

SENATE BILL 320 31
Primary Care Clinic, subject to the requirement that the
grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Harford County) ................................................................... 973,000
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(A) Legislative Initiatives. Provide funds for projects of political
subdivisions and nonprofit organizations .................................. 25,000,000
ZA03 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(A) Legislative Initiatives. Provide funds for projects of political
subdivisions and nonprofit organizations .................................. 25,000,000
(4) An annual tax is imposed on all assessable property in the State in rate and
amount sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, as and when due and
until paid in full. The principal shall be discharged within 15 years after the date of issue
of the bonds.
(5) (a) Prior to the payment of any matching grant funds under the provisions
of Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act, grantees shall provide and expend
matching funds as specified. No part of a grantee’s matching fund may be provided, either
directly or indirectly, from funds of the State, whether appropriated or unappropriated.
Except as otherwise provided, no part of the fund may consist of real property, in kind
contributions, or funds expended prior to the effective date of this Act. In case of any dispute
as to what money or assets may qualify as matching funds, the Board of Public Works shall
determine the matter, and the Board’s decision is final. Grantees have until June 1, 2027,
to present evidence satisfactory to the Board of Public Works that the matching fund will
be provided. If satisfactory evidence is presented, the Board shall certify this fact to the
State Treasurer and the proceeds of the loan shall be expended for the purposes provided in
this Act. If this evidence is not presented by June 1, 2027, the proceeds of the loan shall be
applied to the purposes authorized in § 8–129 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(b) It is further provided that when an equal and matching fund is specified
in Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act, grantees shall provide a matching fund
equal to the lesser of (i) the authorized amount of the State grant or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund certified by the Board of Public Works. If satisfactory evidence is presented,
the Board shall certify this fact and the amount of the matching fund to the State Treasurer
and the proceeds of the loan equal to the amount of the matching fund shall be expended for
the purposes provided in this Act. If this evidence is not presented by June 1, 2027, the
proceeds of the loan shall be applied to the purposes authorized in § 8–129 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article. The proceeds of any amount of the loan in excess of the
matching fund certified by the Board of Public Works shall also be applied to the purposes

SENATE BILL 320
authorized in § 8–129 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(6) (a) Prior to approval by the Board of Public Works of an expenditure of bond
proceeds authorized under Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act, the grantee
shall grant and convey to the Maryland Historical Trust a historic preservation easement
on the property where the capital project assisted by the bond proceeds is located if the
Director of the Trust determines that the capital project impacts real property that is
individually listed in, or eligible for individual listing in, the Maryland Register of Historic
Properties, unless the Director of the Trust also determines that the real property:
(i) Is a type that is already adequately represented among the
Trust’s existing easement properties;
(ii) Is already subject to adequate protections of historic preservation
law or instrument; or
(iii) Has conditions peculiar to it that make requiring an easement
impractical.
(b) If the grantee holds a lease on the property, the Trust may accept an
easement on the leasehold interest.
(c) The easement must be in form, substance, and duration acceptable to
the Director of the Trust.
(d) (i) A recipient may administratively appeal to the Maryland
Historical Trust Board of Trustees a determination made by the Director of the Trust under
subparagraph (a) of this paragraph.
(ii) The decision made by the Maryland Historical Trust Board of
Trustees on an appeal is final and is not subject to further administrative appeal or judicial
review.
(7) The proceeds of the loan must be expended or encumbered by the Board of
Public Works for the purposes provided in this Act no later than June 1, 2032. If any funds
authorized by this Act remain unexpended or unencumbered after June 1, 2032, the amount
of the unexpended or unencumbered authorization shall be canceled and be of no further
force and effect. If bonds have been issued for the loan, the amount of unexpended or
unencumbered bond proceeds shall be disposed of as provided in § 8–129 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article.
(8) Multiple grants provided to the same organization in this Section are in
addition to one another. Unless otherwise provided, any matching fund requirements apply
to each individual grant.
(9) (a) Subject to subparagraphs (b) through (d) of this paragraph, the Board of
Public Works may approve an appropriation in Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of

SENATE BILL 320 33
this Act or in any other previously enacted Maryland Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Act,
notwithstanding differences in:
(i) The name of the grantee or the description of the project, provided
that the proposed use of funds is consistent with the public purpose of the original
appropriation; or
(ii) The location of the project.
(b) When the difference in the name of the grantee is nonsubstantive and
the identity of the grantee can be determined, and when the difference in the description of
the project is nonsubstantive and is consistent with the public purpose of the original
appropriation, the Department of General Services shall record the correct grantee
identification and project description in the grant agreement entered into by the grantee
with the State of Maryland and recorded with the Board of Public Works. In all other
instances of differences provided in subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, the Department of
Budget and Management shall notify the Office of Policy Analysis within the Department
of Legislative Services in writing of:
(i) The differences between an appropriation in Section 1(3) Items
ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act and the proposed use of the funds; and
(ii) The justification that the proposed use of the funds is consistent
with the public purpose of the appropriation.
(c) (i) The Office of Policy Analysis shall have 45 days to review and
comment on the proposed use of the funds.
(ii) If the Office of Policy Analysis does not submit written objections
within 45 days, the Department of Budget and Management shall provide certification in
writing to the Board of Public Works that the proposed use of funds may be approved
notwithstanding differences in the appropriation in Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02
of this Act.
(d) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the provisions of this
paragraph:
(i) Provide an administrative process authorizing the approval of
grants by the Board of Public Works, provided that the proposed use of funds is consistent
with the public purpose of the original appropriation; and
(ii) Be applicable to this Act and all prior Maryland Consolidated
Capital Bond Loans.
(10) Notwithstanding § 8–122.1 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, the
principal amount of any loan authorized under this Act shall be reduced by the cash
proceeds, excluding any accrued interest, received for the State bonds and allocated by the

SENATE BILL 320
Comptroller to the loan.
(11) Notwithstanding §§ 8–125(e) and 8–132 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article, the State Treasurer shall determine the amount of premium from the sale of bonds
in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 to be transferred to the Annuity Bond Fund. Upon each
issuance of State bonds in fiscal years 2024 and 2025, the Treasurer shall notify the
Comptroller of the Treasurer’s determination and the Comptroller shall credit the premium
accordingly. Premium from the sale of bonds in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 that is not
transferred to the Annuity Bond Fund may, upon approval of the Board of Public Works, be
expended by the Comptroller for any of the public purposes set forth in Section 1(3) of this
Act, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Chapter 396 of the Acts of 2011, as amended by Chapter
344 of the Acts of 2022 and Chapter 102 of the Acts of
2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.10 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Program to assist in the
protection of historic property. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 5A–330 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article. Notwithstanding
Section 1(7) of this Act, this authorization may not terminate
prior to June 1, [2025] 2027 ....................................................... 1,000,000
Chapter 444 of the Acts of 2012, as amended by Chapter
344 of the Acts of 2022 and Chapter 102 of the Acts of
2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.10 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Program to assist in the

SENATE BILL 320 35
protection of historic property. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 5A–330 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article. Notwithstanding
Section 1(7) of this Act, this authorization may not terminate
prior to June 1, [2025] 2027 ....................................................... 1,000,000
Chapter 424 of the Acts of 2013
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QB06.04 DORSEY RUN CORRECTIONAL FACILITY
(Anne Arundel County)
(A) 560–Bed Minimum Security Compound. Provide funds to
construct a new 560–bed minimum security compound at
Dorsey Run Correctional Facility, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... [987,000]
881,601
Chapter 424 of the Acts of 2013, as amended by Chapter
463 of the Acts of 2014, Chapter 495 of the Acts of 2015,
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, Chapter 22 of the Acts of
2017, Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018, Chapter 14 of the
Acts of 2019, Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020, and
Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2013 in the total principal amount of [$1,098,036,654]
$1,097,931,255. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article and Article 31, § 22 of the Code.
Chapter 424 of the Acts of 2013, as amended by Chapter
344 of the Acts of 2022 and Chapter 102 of the Acts of
2023
Section 1(3)

SENATE BILL 320
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.10 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Program to assist in the
protection of historic property. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 5A–330 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article. Notwithstanding
Section 1(7) of this Act, this authorization may not terminate
prior to June 1, [2025] 2027 ....................................................... 1,000,000
Chapter 463 of the Acts of 2014, as amended by Chapter
344 of the Acts of 2022 and Chapter 102 of the Acts of
2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.10 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Grant Program to assist in the
protection of historic property. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 5A–330 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article. Notwithstanding
Section 1(7) of this Act, this authorization may not terminate
prior to June 1, [2025] 2027 ....................................................... 1,000,000
Chapter 495 of the Acts of 2015, as amended by Chapter
344 of the Acts of 2022 and Chapter 102 of the Acts of
2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.11 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Grant Program to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance

SENATE BILL 320 37
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with the
standards established under § 5A–330 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article. Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act,
this authorization may not terminate prior to June 1, [2025]
2027 ............................................................................................. 1,000,000
Chapter 495 of the Acts of 2015, as amended by Chapter
102 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.08 JEFFERSON PATTERSON PARK AND MUSEUM
(Calvert County)
(A) St. Leonard’s Creek Shoreline Erosion Control. Provide funds
to begin design of shoreline erosion control measures and other
improvements along St. Leonard’s Creek at Jefferson Patterson
Park. Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act, this
authorization may not terminate prior to June 1, [2025]
2027 .............................................................................................. 261,000
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapter
537 of the Acts of 2020 and Chapter 102 of the Acts of
2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.08 JEFFERSON PATTERSON PARK AND MUSEUM
(Calvert County)
(B) St. Leonard’s Creek Shoreline Erosion Control. Provide funds
to design and construct shoreline erosion control measures
and other improvements along St. Leonard’s Creek at
Jefferson Patterson Park and Museum. Notwithstanding
Section 1(7) of this Act, this authorization may not terminate
prior to June 1, [2025] 2027 .................................................... 2,091,172
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapter
102 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)

SENATE BILL 320
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.11 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Grant Program to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §
5A–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act, this authorization
may not terminate prior to June 1, [2025] 2027 ....................... 1,000,000
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.11 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds to be credited to the
Maryland Historical Trust Capital Grant Fund for historical
preservation and museum assistance. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §§
5A–328 and 5A–353 through 5A–359 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF
THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027 .............................................................. 600,000
(B) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Grant Program to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §
5A–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2027 .............................................................................................. 1,000,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB21 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE
(Baltimore City)

SENATE BILL 320 39
(B) Health Sciences Research Facility III and Surge Building.
Provide funds to complete construction and equipping of a new
research facility for the University of Maryland, Baltimore
School of Medicine ....................................................................... [3,600,000]
3,298,260
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK
(Prince George’s County)
(A) A. James Clark Hall – New Bioengineering Building. Provide
funds to continue construction of and begin equipping new
bioengineering building, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project .......................................................................................... [25,452,000]
25,338,004
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017, as amended by Chapter
537 of the Acts of 2020, Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022,
and Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2017 in the total principal amount of [$1,084,832,631]
$1,084,416,895. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018
Section 1(3)
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – ANNAPOLIS
(Anne Arundel County)
(B) Annapolis Post Office. Provide funds to complete planning,
construction, and equipping of renovations to the Annapolis
Post Office. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE

SENATE BILL 320
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027 ........................................................... 8,209,000
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.11 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Grant Program to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §
5A–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2027 .............................................................................................. 1,000,000
(B) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds to be credited to the
Maryland Historical Trust Capital Grant Fund for historical
preservation and museum assistance. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §§
5A–328 and 5A–353 through 5A–359 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF
THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027 .............................................................. 600,000
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019
Section 1(3)
WA01 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
(B) New Cumberland Barrack and Garage. Provide funds to
construct and equip a new Cumberland Barrack and Garage,
provided that, notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work
may commence on this project prior to the appropriation of all
funds necessary to complete this project (Allegany County) ... [7,154,000]
6,800,199
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019, as amended by Chapter 537 of the Acts
of 2020 and Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on

SENATE BILL 320 41
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2019 in the total principal amount of [$1,085,874,166]
$1,085,520,365. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QR02.02 MARYLAND CORRECTIONAL TRAINING CENTER
(Washington County)
(A) Housing Unit Windows and Steam Heating System. Provide
funds to complete construction of the replacement of windows
and heating systems for housing units at the Maryland
Correctional Training Center .................................................. [7,460,000]
3,025,107
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(C) New Student Services Support Building. Provide funds to
complete construction and equipping of a new Student
Services Support Building to house student services
functions .................................................................................... [4,851,000]
3,851,000
WA01 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
(B) New Cumberland Barrack and Garage. Provide funds to
complete construction and equip a new Cumberland Barrack
and Garage (Allegany County) ................................................ [2,352,000]
1,865,764
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
(A) Atlantic General Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Atlantic General Hospital Corporation for the
design, construction, and equipping of a new ambulatory
surgery facility, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund

SENATE BILL 320
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of
this Act (Worcester County) ..................................................... [800,000]
0
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020, as amended by Chapter 344 of the
Acts of 2022 and Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2020 in the total principal amount of [$1,087,177,584]
$1,080,456,455. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021
Section 1(3)
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – ANNAPOLIS
(Anne Arundel County)
(D) State House [Exterior and Grounds] AND OLD TREASURY
BUILDING Restoration. Provide funds to continue design and
begin construction of the restoration of AND IMPROVEMENTS
TO the exterior and grounds of the historic Maryland State
House and INTERIOR OF THE STATE HOUSE AND Old
Treasury buildings, INCLUDING THE OLD SENATE
CHAMBER, in the Annapolis State Government Complex ..... 2,750,000
Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021, as amended by Chapter 344 of the Acts
of 2022 and Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2021 in the total principal amount of [$1,039,550,388]
$1,038,046,291. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and

SENATE BILL 320 43
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
VE01 RESIDENTIAL SERVICES
(B) Cheltenham Youth Treatment Center. Provide funds to
complete design and begin construction of a treatment center
for female and male youths at the Cheltenham campus,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
commence on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project (Prince George’s County) .... [1,506,768]
2,671
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022
Section 1(3)
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB30 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND GLOBAL CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) Adelphi Building Renovation. Provide funds to design,
construct, and renovate the Adelphi Building for the University
of Maryland Global Campus ....................................................... [1,500,000]
1,073,662
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022, as amended by Chapter 102 of the
Acts of 2023 and Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
Section 1
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2022 in the total principal amount of [$1,179,688,000]
$1,179,261,662. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)

SENATE BILL 320
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – ANNAPOLIS
(Anne Arundel County)
(C) State House [Exterior and Grounds] AND OLD TREASURY
BUILDING Restoration. Provide funds to complete
construction of the restoration of AND IMPROVEMENTS TO
the exterior and grounds of the historic Maryland State House
and INTERIOR OF THE STATE HOUSE AND Old Treasury
buildings, INCLUDING THE OLD SENATE CHAMBER, in the
Annapolis State Government Complex ................................... [20,339,000]
18,339,000
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Clifton T. Perkins Hospital. Provide funds to complete design
and begin construction of renovations to the North Wing of
Clifton T. Perkins Hospital Center and an addition to the
hospital, provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act,
work may commence on this project prior to the appropriation
of all funds necessary to complete this project .......................... [21,676,000]
13,227,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB30 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND GLOBAL CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) Adelphi Building Renovation. Provide funds to design,
construct, and renovate the Adelphi Building ........................... [650,000]
0
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(DN) Incubator Spaces – Cannabis. Provide funds to the Maryland
Economic Development Corporation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
facilities to be used as incubator spaces in accordance with §
36–406 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article,
contingent on enactment of HB 556 or SB 516 (Statewide) ...... [2,000,000]
0

SENATE BILL 320 45
Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023, as amended by Chapter 720 of the
Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2023 in the total principal amount of [$1,196,702,609]
$1,180,603,609. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Section 1(3)
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB24 TOWSON UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore County)
(A) New College of Health Professions Building. Provide funds to
complete construction and equipping of a new building for the
College of Health Professions and demolition of Linthicum
Hall, Glen Esk Counseling Center, and Dowell Health
Center ....................................................................................... [41,079,609]
38,079,609
Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2024 in the total principal amount of [$1,845,046,000]
$1,805,846,500. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Section 1(3)
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – BALTIMORE
(Baltimore City)

SENATE BILL 320
(F) William Donald Schaefer Tower Renovation. Provide funds to
complete design and begin construction of the renovation of
the William Donald Schaefer Tower, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ............................................................ [16,500,000]
0
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
MA01 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(C) Federally Qualified Health Centers Grant Program. Provide
grants to acquire, design, construct, renovate, and equip
buildings to be used as Federally Qualified Health Centers
(Statewide) ................................................................................ [9,894,000]
6,994,000
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Renovation of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital North Wing. Provide
funds to continue construction and begin equipping of
renovations to the North Wing of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital
Center and an addition to the hospital, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................. [16,051,000]
0
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB30 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND GLOBAL CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) Adelphi Building Renovation. Provide funds to design,
construct, and renovate the Adelphi Building ........................... [1,248,500]
0
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(B) Carter–Grant–Wilson Building Renovation. Provide funds to
complete design and begin construction and equipping of the
renovation of the Carter–Grant–Wilson building for the School
of Graduate Studies and the Division of International Affairs,

SENATE BILL 320 47
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
commence on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project ............................................... [4,445,000]
1,945,000
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
declares that it is the public policy of this State to manage State general obligation bond
debt in a manner that will maintain Maryland’s AAA bond rating. The General Assembly
further declares that legislative oversight, control, and review of all forms of State
obligations are essential to maintenance of the State’s existing bond rating and protection
of the fiscal integrity of the State.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, before work may commence
pursuant to any supplement to any appropriation contained in this Act, satisfactory
evidence must be given to the Board of Public Works that the project can be completed with
the aggregate of the funds in this Act and previously appropriated for the stated purpose.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) with the approval of the Department of Budget and Management, any
appropriation for design provided in this Act may be used to fund construction if the amount
of the appropriation exceeds the amount required for design expenses, including allowances
for contingencies; and
(2) with the approval of the Department of Budget and Management, any
appropriation for construction provided in this Act may be used to purchase capital
equipment if the amount of the appropriation exceeds the amount required for construction
expenses, including allowances for contingencies.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as otherwise provided
in this Act, before a State agency or institution named in this Act as responsible for an
individual item may begin work with funds appropriated by this Act, the agency or
institution shall provide satisfactory evidence to the Board of Public Works that the work
described in the individual item can be completed with the funds specified for that item.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, with the approval of the
Department of Budget and Management, any appropriation under the provisions of this
Act that is in excess of the amount needed for a project may be credited to the Construction
Contingency Fund under § 3–609 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Notwithstanding the fund balance restriction set forth in § 3–609(c) of the State Finance
and Procurement Article, any funds credited to the Fund may cause the total balance in
the Fund to exceed 1.25% of the capital debt affordability limit as determined under Title
8 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, in fiscal year 2026.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if federal funds are available
to help accomplish any project identified in this Act, the State agency or institution
responsible for the project shall make efforts through proper administrative procedures to

SENATE BILL 320
obtain these federal funds. Before spending any funds appropriated by this Act, the agency
or institution shall certify its efforts to the Board of Public Works and state the reason for
any failure to obtain federal funds. If federal funds are obtained, they shall be used to defray
the costs of the project described in this Act and not to expand its scope.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) for any appropriation for the planning of a State–owned project provided in
this Act, if a program required by § 3–602(d) of the State Finance and Procurement Article
has not been submitted, the State agency or institution responsible for the project shall
submit a program to the Department of Budget and Management for approval before funds
may be expended from the appropriation; and
(2) for any appropriation for the construction of a State–owned project provided
in this Act, if preliminary plans and outline specifications required by § 3–602(f)(2)(i) of the
State Finance and Procurement Article have not been prepared, the State agency or
institution responsible for the project shall submit preliminary plans and outline
specifications to the Department of Budget and Management for approval before funds may
be expended from the appropriation.
SECTION 10. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That no portion of the proceeds of
a loan or any of the matching funds provided for a project funded under this Act may be
used for the furtherance of an essentially religious endeavor. Upon the request of the Board
of Public Works, a recipient of the proceeds of a loan under this Act shall submit evidence
satisfactory to the Board that none of the proceeds of the loan or any matching funds has
been or is being used for a purpose prohibited by this Act.
SECTION 11. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Comptroller may
advance funds to any loan funds account established pursuant to a general obligation bond
loan enabling Act for any expenditure authorized by that Act, provided that if general
obligation bonds have not been issued under the authority of that Act, the next ensuing
sale of general obligation bonds shall include the issuance of bonds under the authority of
that Act in an amount at least equivalent to the amount of the funds so advanced.
SECTION 12. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 13, 14, 15, and 16
of Chapter 720 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2024 be repealed.
SECTION 13. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Preauthorization Act of 2026 in the total principal amount
of $665,908,000. These loans shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.

SENATE BILL 320 49
(2) The bonds to evidence these loans or installments of these loans may be sold
as a single issue or may be consolidated and sold as part of a single issue of bonds under §
8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended, on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(B) New Supreme Court of Maryland Building. Provide funds to
continue construction of a new Supreme Court of Maryland
Building in Annapolis, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project
(Anne Arundel County) ............................................................... 81,408,000
(C) Washington County District Court Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to complete construction of a renovation and an
addition to the existing Washington County District Court in
Hagerstown (Washington County) .............................................. 2,948,000
MILITARY DEPARTMENT
DH01.04 MILITARY DEPARTMENT OPERATIONS AND
MAINTENANCE
(Frederick County)
(A) Frederick Readiness Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to complete construction of the renovation and
expansion of the Frederick Readiness Center ............................ 2,678,000
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
KA05 CAPITAL GRANTS AND LOANS ADMINISTRATION
(Garrett County)
(A) Natural Resources Development Fund. Provide funds to
construct capital development projects on Department of
Natural Resources property in accordance with § 5–903(g) of
the Natural Resources Article, provided that notwithstanding
Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to
the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this

SENATE BILL 320
project .......................................................................................... 1,008,000
(1) Mt. Nebo Wildlife Management
Area – Natural Resource Police
New Office, Garage and Storage
Facility ............................................ 1,008,000
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
MA01 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(Statewide)
(A) Demolish Decommissioned Buildings. Provide funds to
complete the demolition of the Clifton T. Perkins Hospital
Center Dormitory Buildings 1 and 2 and continue the
demolition of the Regional Institute for Children and
Adolescents – Baltimore Old Dormitory Building provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 1,882,000
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Renovation of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital North Wing. Provide
funds to continue construction of renovations to the North Wing
of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital Center and an addition to the
hospital provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act,
work may continue on this project prior to the appropriation of
all funds necessary to complete this project ................................ 27,071,000
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QR02.03 ROXBURY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION
(Washington County)
(A) RCI Perimeter Fence System Replacement. Provide funds to
continue construction of the replacement perimeter fencing and
security systems at Roxbury Correctional Institution, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ............................................................... 14,342,000
QT04 DIVISION OF PRETRIAL DETENTION
(Baltimore City)

SENATE BILL 320 51
(A) Baltimore Therapeutic Treatment Center. Provide funds to
continue construction of a therapeutic treatment and detention
center at the Baltimore City Correctional Complex, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ............................................................... 231,558,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB21 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE CAMPUS
(Baltimore City)
(A) New Dental Ambulatory Surgery Center. Provide funds to
complete construction of an ambulatory surgery center ............ 862,000
(B) New School of Social Work Building. Provide funds to complete
construction of a new School of Social Work building ................ 39,430,000
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Health and Human Sciences Complex. Provide funds to
continue the construction of the Health and Human Sciences
Complex for the School of Public Health and Academy for
Innovation and Entrepreneurship, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 39,315,000
(B) New Interdisciplinary Engineering Building – Zupnik Hall.
Provide funds to complete construction of the interdisciplinary
engineering building ................................................................... 10,860,000
RB24 TOWSON UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore County)
(A) Smith Hall Renovation and Reconstruction. Provide funds to
complete construction of the partial demolition, renovation, and
reconstruction of Smith Hall for the College of Fine Arts and
Communication ............................................................................ 23,736,000
RB29 SALISBURY UNIVERSITY
(Wicomico County)
(A) Blackwell Hall Renovation. Provide funds to complete
construction of the renovation of Blackwell Hall to create a
Student Services Center .............................................................. 361,000

SENATE BILL 320
RB31 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND BALTIMORE COUNTY
(Baltimore County)
(A) Sherman Hall Renovation. Provide funds to complete
construction of the renovation of Sherman Hall ......................... 9,087,000
RB36 UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND OFFICE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Rita Colwell Center Deferred Maintenance. Provide funds to
continue construction of deferred maintenance improvements,
including roof replacement and central plant upgrades, at the
Rita Colwell Center in Baltimore City, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 2,906,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new high school boys’ residence and student
center, high school girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite
health center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project .... 9,224,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on each of these projects prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete the
project .......................................................................................... 35,502,000
(1) Community College of Baltimore
County – Catonsville – Student
Services Center Renovation and
Expansion (Baltimore County) ....... 7,589,000

SENATE BILL 320 53
(2) Community College of Baltimore
County – Essex – Primary
Switchgear and Distribution
Replacement (Baltimore County) ... 2,116,000
(3) Hagerstown Community College –
Advanced Technology Center
Renovation (Washington County) .. 2,081,000
(4) Montgomery College – New
Germantown Student Services
Center (Montgomery County) ......... 19,139,000
(5) Montgomery College – Rockville –
Library Renovation (Montgomery
County) ............................................ 4,577,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to continue construction of a new electric substation and
electrical infrastructure upgrades, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 40,500,000
(B) New Science Center, Phase II. Provide funds to continue
construction of the New Science Center, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 76,797,000
UB00 MARYLAND ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE
(St. Mary’s County)
(A) State Water and Sewer Infrastructure Improvement Fund.
Provide funds to design, construct, and equip capital
improvements for State institutions. Expenditures for the
following project may not exceed the amount listed below by
more than 7.5% without notification to the General Assembly.
Funds may only be spent on the project listed below or on prior
or future authorized projects. Expenditure of any part of this
appropriation for a prior or future authorized project shall also
require notification to the General Assembly ............................. 2,276,000
(1) Charlotte Hall Veterans Home –

SENATE BILL 320
Water Treatment Plant Upgrade ... 2,276,000
WA01 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
(A) Barrack J – Annapolis: Communications Room and New
Garage. Provide funds to complete construction of a new garage
and the renovation of Barrack J in Annapolis for a new
communications room (Anne Arundel County) ........................... 3,326,000
(B) Barrack L – Forestville: New Barrack and Garage. Provide
funds to complete construction of a replacement barrack and
garage in Forestville (Prince George’s County) ........................... 8,831,000
SECTION 14. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Preauthorization Act of 2027 in the total principal amount
of $475,359,000. These loans shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence these loans or installments of these loans may be sold
as a single issue or may be consolidated and sold as part of a single issue of bonds under §
8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended, on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(Anne Arundel County)
(B) New Supreme Court of Maryland Building. Provide funds to
complete construction of a new Supreme Court of Maryland
Building in Annapolis .................................................................. 25,408,000
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
MA01 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(Statewide)

SENATE BILL 320 55
(A) Demolish Decommissioned Buildings. Provide funds to
complete the demolition of the Clifton T. Perkins Hospital
Center Dormitory Buildings 1 and 2 and the Regional
Institute for Children and Adolescents – Baltimore Old
Dormitory Building ..................................................................
187,000
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Renovation of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital North Wing. Provide
funds to complete construction of renovations to the North
Wing of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital Center and an addition to
the hospital ................................................................................. 16,032,000
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QR02.03 ROXBURY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION
(Washington County)
(A) RCI Perimeter Fence System Replacement. Provide funds to
complete construction of the replacement perimeter fencing
and security systems at Roxbury Correctional Institution ........ 7,171,000
QT04 DIVISION OF PRETRIAL DETENTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) Baltimore Therapeutic Treatment Center. Provide funds to
continue construction of a therapeutic treatment and detention
center at the Baltimore City Correctional Complex, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ............................................................... 238,023,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB21 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE CAMPUS
(Baltimore City)
(A) Central Electric Substation and Electrical Infrastructure
Upgrades. Provide funds to complete construction of an electric
substation and electrical infrastructure upgrades ..................... 1,523,000
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Health and Human Sciences Complex. Provide funds to

SENATE BILL 320
continue the construction of the Health and Human Sciences
Complex for the School of Public Health and Academy for
Innovation and Entrepreneurship, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 44,325,000
RB36 UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND OFFICE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Rita Colwell Center Deferred Maintenance. Provide funds to
complete construction of deferred maintenance improvements,
including central plant upgrades, at the Rita Colwell Center in
Baltimore City .............................................................................. 4,820,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new high school boys’ residence and student
center, high school girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite
health center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project ........................................................................................... 16,731,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on each of these projects prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete the
project .......................................................................................... 21,842,000
(1) Community College of Baltimore
County – Essex – Primary
Switchgear and Distribution
Replacement (Baltimore County) 2,703,000
(2) Montgomery College – New
Germantown Student Services

SENATE BILL 320 57
Center (Montgomery County) 19,139,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to continue construction of a new electric substation and
electrical infrastructure upgrades, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 22,500,000
(B) New Science Center, Phase II. Provide funds to continue
construction of the New Science Center, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 76,797,000
SECTION 15. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Preauthorization Act of 2028 in the total principal amount
of $336,550,000. These loans shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence these loans or installments of these loans may be sold
as a single issue or may be consolidated and sold as part of a single issue of bonds under §
8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended, on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QT04 DIVISION OF PRETRIAL DETENTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) Baltimore Therapeutic Treatment Center. Provide funds to
continue construction of a therapeutic treatment and detention
center at the Baltimore City Correctional Complex, provided

SENATE BILL 320
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ............................................................... 252,510,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Health and Human Sciences Complex. Provide funds to
complete the construction of the Health and Human Sciences
Complex for the School of Public Health and Academy for
Innovation and Entrepreneurship .............................................. 11,081,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new high school boys’ residence and student
center, high school girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite
health center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project ........................................................................................... 10,407,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article ............................................................... 9,254,000
(1) Community College of Baltimore
County – Essex – Primary
Switchgear and Distribution
Replacement (Baltimore County) 451,000
(2) Montgomery College – New
Germantown Student Services
Center (Montgomery County) 8,803,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)

SENATE BILL 320 59
(A) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to complete construction of a new electric substation and
electrical infrastructure upgrades .............................................. 8,500,000
(B) New Science Center, Phase II. Provide funds to complete
construction of the New Science Center ..................................... 44,798,000
SECTION 16. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Preauthorization Act of 2029 in the total principal amount
of $54,592,000. These loans shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence these loans or installments of these loans may be sold
as a single issue or may be consolidated and sold as part of a single issue of bonds under §
8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended, on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QT04 DIVISION OF PRETRIAL DETENTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) Baltimore Therapeutic Treatment Center. Provide funds to
complete construction of a therapeutic treatment and detention
center at the Baltimore City Correctional Complex .................. 40,116,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to complete
construction of a new high school boys’ residence and student
center, high school girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite
health center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick ................................................................... 14,476,000

SENATE BILL 320
SECTION 17. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the net new debt to be
authorized by this Act may not exceed $1,750,000,000 as evidenced by the following:
Debt to be authorized by this Act ...................................... 1,814,825,000
Subtotal .............................................................................. 1,814,825,000
Reductions in previously authorized State Debt made in this
bill ........................................................................................ 64,825,000
New debt to be authorized by this Act ............................... 1,750,000,000
Bond premium proceeds authorized by this Act ................... 140,134,000
Total authorizations and bond premium proceeds authorized
by this Act ........................................................................ 1,954,959,000
SECTION 18. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Board of Public Works
may approve contracts and otherwise obligate funds authorized in this Act upon the
effective date of the relevant section of this Act.
SECTION 19. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 13 of this Act shall
take effect June 1, 2026.
SECTION 20. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 14 of this Act shall
take effect June 1, 2027.
SECTION 21. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 15 of this Act shall
take effect June 1, 2028.
SECTION 22. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 16 of this Act shall
take effect June 1, 2029.
SECTION 23. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Sections 19, 20, 21, and 22 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2025.